Maryland, session 2026, HB1330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–104.
(j) (1) A property tax credit under this section may not be granted to a
homeowner whose combined net worth exceeds $200,000 as of December 31 of the calendar
year that precedes [the] JULY 1 OF THE TAXABLE year [in] FOR which the homeowner
applies for the property tax credit or whose combined gross income exceeds $60,000 in that
same calendar year.
(l) (1) On [or before] the February 15 that precedes the taxable year [in] FOR
which the property tax credit under this section is sought, the Department shall make
available that year’s property tax credit application form.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subsections (m), (u), and (v) of this section,
on or before [October 1] FEBRUARY 14 of the taxable year [in] FOR which the property
tax credit under this section is sought, a homeowner may apply to the Department for a
property tax credit under this section.
(ii) The application shall be made on the form that the Department
provides.
[(3) (i) For good cause, the Department may accept an application after
October 1 but on or before October 31 of the taxable year.
– 1 –

Ch. 782 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) The Department shall notify the homeowner in writing of its
acceptance or rejection of a late application.]
[(4)] (3) The homeowner shall state under oath that the facts in the
application are true.
[(5)] (4) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
to substantiate the application, the applicant may be required to provide a copy of an
income tax return, or other evidence detailing gross income or net worth.
(ii) An applicant who is required to substantiate an application
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph may, under penalties of perjury, attest to gross
income in lieu of providing an income tax return if the applicant was not required to and
did not file an income tax return.
(o) (1) For any eligible application received before the April 15 that precedes
the taxable year [in] FOR which the property tax credit under this section is sought, the
Department shall request the appropriate county collector to prepare a tax bill that reflects
the final tax liability.
(2) If a homeowner presents the revised tax bill or a tax voucher with the
tax bill to the county collector, the homeowner may make a single payment for the final tax
liability.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (u) of this section[,]:
(I) if a credit is granted for an eligible application received after
April 15 BUT ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, property tax is not due on the property until
30 days after the revised tax bill is sent to the homeowner; AND
(II) IF A CREDIT IS GRANTED FOR AN ELIGIBLE APPLICATION
RECEIVED AFTER OCTOBER 1 BUT ON OR BEFORE FEBRUARY 14, PROPERTY TAX IS
DUE ON THE PROPERTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 10–204.3 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(4) If a municipal corporation or a special taxing district issues a tax bill
separate from the county tax bill, the county may require the homeowner to submit:
(i) the separate tax bill; or
(ii) proof of payment of the separate tax bill.
(u) (1) Under the conditions set forth in this subsection, the Department may
accept an application from a homeowner within:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 782
(i) 1 year after April 15 of the taxable year for which the property
tax credit under this section is sought, if the homeowner:
1. is applying for the first time; or
2. has filed an application on or before [October 1]
FEBRUARY 14 in each of the 3 taxable years immediately preceding the taxable year for
which the credit is sought; or
(ii) 3 years after April 15 of the taxable year for which a credit is
sought, if the homeowner is:
1. A. at least 70 years old as of the taxable year for which
a credit is sought; or
B. enrolled in the Homeowner Protection Program
established under Title 14, Subtitle 8, Part VII of this article; and
2. was eligible for the credit under this section for the taxable
year for which the credit is sought.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2027.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –